Washington statutes.
RCW 36.60.100

Establishment, modification, or dissolution of district—Alternate method.

The method of establishing, modifying, or dissolving a county rail district in RCW 36.60.110 through 36.60.130 is an alternate method to that specified in RCW 36.60.020.

[ 1986 c 26 s 1.]